apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
<!-- The lowercase letters of the Welsh alphabet followed by letters with accents, followed by letters found in loan words -->
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHILMNOPRSTUWYÂÊÎÔŴŶJKVXZÁÉÍÓÚÄËÏÖÜQabcdefghilmnoprstuwyâêîôŵŷáïjkvxzáéíóúäëïöüq</alphabet>
  <!-- Symbol definitions -->
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-cy-en.symbols.xml"/>
  <!-- Paradigm definitions -->
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="proper_names">
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* ap [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>(Rt Hon|Dr).? ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>(Lady|Miss|Ms|Mrs).? ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>(Sir|Lord|Mr).? ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Syr</l>
          <r>Syr</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Ditectif<b/>Sarjant</l>
          <r>Ditectif<b/>Sarjant</r>
        </p>
        <re> ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Ditectif</l>
          <r>Ditectif</r>
        </p>
        <re> ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Tad</l>
          <r>Tad</r>
        </p>
        <re> ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="acronimos">
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z]+([A-Z])?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][0-9]+([0-9])?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- 1990s -->
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l>au</l>
          <r>au<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- 90,000 troedfedd sgwâr  -->
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l><b/>troedfedd<b/>sgwâr</l>
          <r><b/>troedfedd<b/>sgwâr<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Years old -->
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l><b/>oed</l>
          <r><b/>oed<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="time">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+[.:][0-5][0-9](pm|PM|am|AM)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9](pm|PM|am|AM)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="un__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tri__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="nawfed__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ordinals">
      <e>
        <re>[1-9]?</re>
        <p>
          <l>1af</l>
          <r>1af<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]?</re>
        <p>
          <l>2il</l>
          <r>2il<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]?</re>
        <p>
          <l>3ydd</l>
          <r>3ydd<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]?</re>
        <p>
          <l>4ydd</l>
          <r>4ydd<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]?</re>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ed<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="currency">
      <e>
        <re>[£$€][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mon"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[£$€][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?m</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mon"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!·]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    

    <e lm="un"><i>un</i><par n="un__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dau"><par n="initial-d"/><i>au</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dwy"><par n="initial-d"/><i>wy</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tair"><par n="initial-t"/><i>air</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tri"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ri</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pedwar"><par n="initial-p"/><i>edwar</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pedair"><par n="initial-p"/><i>edair</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pum"><par n="initial-p"/><i>um</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pump"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ump</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="chwe"><par n="initial-c"/><i>hwe</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="chwech"><par n="initial-c"/><i>hwech</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="saith"><i>saith</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="wyth"><i>wyth</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="naw"><i>naw</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="deg"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eg</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ugain"><i>ugain</i><par n="tri__num"/></e>
    <e lm="unfed"><i>unfed</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ail"><i>ail</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="trydedd"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rydedd</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="trydydd" r="LR"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rydydd</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="pedwaredd"><par n="initial-p"/><i>edwaredd</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="pedwerydd" r="LR"><par n="initial-p"/><i>edwerydd</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="pumed"><par n="initial-p"/><i>umed</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="chweched"><i>chweched</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="seithfed"><i>seithfed</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="wythfed"><i>wythfed</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nawfed"><i>nawfed</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="degfed"><par n="initial-d"/><i>egfed</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="pymthegfed"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ymthegfed</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ugeinfed"><i>ugeinfed</i><par n="nawfed__det"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="proper_names"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="acronimos"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="ordinals"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="time"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="currency"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="paresq"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="pardret"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separ"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/>
    </e>
